Mississippi, session 2026, HB4069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Severe Winter Storm of 2026 ("Winter Storm") Electric Utility Customer Relief and Electric Utility System Restoration Act". SECTION 2.  It is hereby determined and declared to be the policy of the State of Mississippi, for the benefit of customers of the electric utilities within the state that the state establish a mechanism by which the Mississippi Public Service Commission may authorize and certify an electric utility financing order and the state may issue system restoration bonds pursuant to that financing order, the proceeds from which shall be used to securitize the system restoration costs and storm damage reserve levels of those electric utilities affected by the winter storm, thereby providing electric utility customers relief from traditional methods of recovering system restoration costs. The exercise of powers conferred by this act are the performance of essential public purposes. SECTION 3.  As used in this act: (a) "Commission" or "Public Service Commission" means the Mississippi Public Service Commission. (b) "Customer" or "electric utility customer" means a retail customer of an electric utility. (c)  "Electric utility" or "utility" means any utility as defined in Section 77-3-3(d)(i), Mississippi Code of 1972, but not including electric power associations. (d)  "Eligible funds" means any funds derived from any source which may by law or other authorization be used to retire any obligations arising from or connected with the issuance of system restoration bonds. (e)  "Financing costs" means: (i)  Interest and acquisition, defeasance or redemption premiums that are payable on system restoration bonds issued pursuant to this act; (ii)  Any amount required to fund or replenish any system restoration sinking fund or other reserve, fund, or account established pursuant to the authority conferred under this act and the terms of any financing order or other financing documents pertaining to system restoration bonds; and (iii)  Any other cost related to supporting, repaying, servicing and refunding system restoration bonds, including, but not limited to, servicing fees, accounting and auditing fees, trustee fees, legal fees, consulting fees, administrative fees, placement and underwriting fees, rating agency fees, stock exchange listing and compliance fees and credit enhancement fees. (f)  "Financing order" means an irrevocable final order issued by the Public Service Commission pursuant to Section 4 of this act which provides a mechanism for an electric utility to request the State Bond Commission to authorize the issuance of system restoration bonds and the creation of system restoration property. (g)  "Issuance costs" means: (i)  Any initial payment made on or before issuance and any amount required to fund any system restoration sinking fund or other account established pursuant to the authority conferred under this act and the terms of any financing order; and (ii)  Any other cost related to issuance of system restoration bonds, including, but not limited to, trustee fees, legal fees, consulting fees, administrative fees, credit enhancement fees, placement and underwriting fees, capitalized interest, rating agency fees, stock exchange listing and compliance fees, and filing fees, including costs related to obtaining the financing order. (h)  "State" means the State of Mississippi. (i)  "Storm" means the Winter Storm, which began on January 23, 2026, and caused catastrophic damages to the people and property of and within the State of Mississippi, including electric utilities and their facilities throughout the state, and which has been declared a major disaster by the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), dated February 6, 2026. (j)  "System restoration activity" means any activity or activities by or on behalf of an electric utility in connection with the preparation for, the provision of and the restoration of service associated with electric power outages affecting customers of an electric utility as the result of the storm, including, but not limited to, mobilization, logistical support staging, housing, fueling, contracting and construction, removal, reconstruction, replacement or repair of electric generation, transmission or distribution facilities, the recovery of fuel costs related to the operation of electric generation facilities in advance of and through the duration of the Storm and related activities approved by the commission. (k)  "System restoration bonds" or "bonds" means those bonds, including refunding bonds, that are issued by the State Bond Commission pursuant to this act. (l)  "System restoration charge" means the mechanism and amounts authorized by the Public Service Commission to recover, finance or refinance the system restoration bonds, financing costs and any other cost necessary to otherwise ensure the timely payment of system restoration bonds and other required amounts and charges payable in connection with the system restoration bonds to be imposed on, and as a part of, all customer bills and collected by an electric utility or its successors or assignees, or a collection agent, through a charge that is separate and apart from the base rates of the electric utility, which charge shall be paid by customers, including special contract customers, for and with regard to all electric load directly or indirectly connected to electric facilities of the electric utility or its successors or assignees under the Public Service Commission approved rate schedules, even if the customer elects to purchase electricity from an alternative electricity supplier following a fundamental change in regulation of public utilities in this state. (m)  "System restoration costs" means, at the option and request of the electric utility, and as approved by the commission pursuant to Section 4 of this act, those prudent incremental costs incurred or to be incurred, as determined by the commission, by an electric utility in undertaking a system restoration activity.  Such costs shall be net of applicable insurance proceeds and, where determined appropriate by the commission taking into account the interests of the electric utility's customers, the need for financial stability in the provision of electric utility service, and the public interest, and such costs shall include adjustments for normal capital replacement and operating costs and other potential offsets and adjustments; however, such costs shall not include system outage related lost profits.  System restoration costs may, in the commission's discretion, include the costs to finance any deficiency or deficiencies in storm damage reserves incurred before such time as the system restoration bonds are issued and any costs of retiring any other existing indebtedness relating to system restoration activities. (n)  "System restoration property" means: (i)  All rights and interests of the state, as the assignee of an electric utility under a financing order, arising out of or in connection with the issuance of system restoration bonds under this act, including the right to receive the system restoration charges, as periodically adjusted, imposed, billed, collected and transferred by the electric utility on behalf of the state pursuant to a financing order, and the right to obtain periodic adjustments to such charges as provided in the financing order and this act.  System restoration property shall not be an asset of the electric utility; but, the electric utility shall have only a duty to carry out its obligations and responsibilities under this act and the State Bond Commission action taken under this act with respect to system restoration property; and (ii)  All collections, claims, rights to payments, payments, money or proceeds arising from the rights and interests specified in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, regardless of whether such collections, claims, rights to payment, payments, money or proceeds are imposed, billed, received, collected, or maintained together with or commingled with other collections, rights to payment, payments, money or proceeds. (o)  "Storm damage reserve" means an electric utility storm reserve or such other similar reserve, as may be amended from time to time, established by law, rule or pursuant to any order of the commission. (p)  "Mississippi Public Utilities Staff" means those persons employed by the public utilities staff established in Section 77-2-1, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 4. (1)  Not more than one hundred eighty (180) days after the effective date of this act, an electric utility affected by the storm may petition the Public Service Commission for a financing order to make such determinations as are provided for in this section which, when transmitted by an electric utility to the State Bond Commission as provided in this act, authorizes the State Bond Commission to issue system restoration bonds.  In addition to any other information required by the Public Service Commission, the applying electric utility shall: (a)  Describe the system restoration activities that the electric utility has undertaken or proposes to undertake and describe the reasons for undertaking the activities. (b)  Set forth the known prudently incurred system restoration costs and an estimate of the costs of any system restoration activities that are not completed, or for which the costs are not yet known, as identified and requested by the electric utility. (c)  Set forth the storm damage reserve that the electric utility proposes to establish or replenish and that such electric utility has determined would be appropriate to recover through system restoration bonds.  The electric utility shall also identify the level that the electric utility is funding or will seek to fund through other means, together with a description of the factors and calculations used in determining the amounts and methods of recovery. (d)  Indicate whether the electric utility proposes to finance all or a portion of the system restoration costs and storm damage reserve using system restoration bonds.  If the electric utility proposes to finance a portion of such costs, the electric utility shall identify that portion in its application. (e)  Estimate the financing costs and issuance costs related to the system restoration bonds. (f)  Describe and estimate the system restoration charge necessary to recover the system restoration cost and fund or replenish the storm damage reserve, including any financing costs and issuance costs and the period for recovery of such costs. (g)  Estimate any cost savings and demonstrate how it would avoid or significantly mitigate rate impacts to customers resulting from financing system restoration costs with system restoration bonds as opposed to the traditional method of recovering such costs from customers and through alternative financing methods available to the electric utility. (h)  File with the Public Service Commission direct testimony supporting the application. (i)  Timely provide the Public Service Commission or the Mississippi Public Utilities Staff such additional information and documentation as they may reasonably request. (j)  Provide a copy of the petition to the State Bond Commission. (2)  The Executive Director of the Mississippi Public Utilities Staff, shall enter into a professional services contract with a public accounting firm to assist the staff in auditing the electric utility's system restoration costs to determine that such costs are properly identified and recorded.  Such audit shall begin prior to the electric utility's petition as described in Section 4(1) of this act and promptly after the effective date of this act. Any expenses associated with such services shall be included as part of financing costs and included in the total amount of system restoration bonds issued pursuant to this act. (3)  (a)  Proceedings on an application submitted pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall begin with a petition by an electric utility and shall be disposed of in accordance with applicable Public Service Commission procedural rules related to miscellaneous application proceedings, except that the provisions of this section, to the extent applicable, shall control.  The issuance of a financing order, the system restoration bonds and the implementation or adjustment of a system restoration charge under this act shall not constitute a change in rates pursuant to Section 77-3-37 or 77-3-39, Mississippi Code of 1972. (i)  Not more than sixty (60) days after the date the petition is filed, the commission shall issue a financing order or an order rejecting the petition.  A party to the Public Service Commission proceeding may petition the commission for reconsideration of the financing order not more than seven (7) days after the date the financing order is issued.  The Public Service Commission shall rule on the petition for reconsideration, by and through the issuance of a final financing order upon reconsideration, not more than fourteen (14) days after the filing of the petition.  A failure by the Public Service Commission to act upon such petition for reconsideration within the specified time period shall be deemed a refusal of the petition, and the financing order shall remain in effect.  Any judicial review shall be as provided in Section 5 of this act. (ii)  Upon issuance of a final financing order to an electric utility, the electric utility shall have sixty (60) days from the issuance of the financing order to request the State Bond Commission to issue system restoration bonds and the State Bond Commission shall authorize and issue the system restoration bonds as soon as commercially practicable. (iii)  If financing orders are issued to more than one (1) electric utility, the State Bond Commission may aggregate multiple financing orders into a single issue of system restoration bonds so as to reduce the costs of issuance. (b)  In a financing order issued on behalf of an electric utility, the Public Service Commission shall: (i)  Specify the amount of prudently incurred system restoration costs and the level of storm damage reserves, taking into consideration, to the extent the Public Service Commission deems appropriate, any other methods used to recover these costs. (ii)  With advice from, and in consultation with, the State Bond Commission and any outside consultant or counsel, provide a description and estimate of the amount of financing costs which may be recovered through system restoration charges and the minimum and maximum period over which such costs may be recovered. (iii)  Determine that the financing method proposed pursuant to this act is reasonably expected to result in lower overall costs or would avoid or significantly mitigate rate impacts to customers as compared with alternative methods of financing or traditional methods of recovering system restoration costs. (iv)  Provide that, for the period specified pursuant to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the imposition and collection of the system restoration charge authorized in the financing order shall be paid by customers including special contract customers, for and with regard to all electric load directly or indirectly connected to electric facilities of the electric utility or its successors or assignees under the Public Service Commission approved rate schedules, even if the customer elects to purchase electricity from an alternative electricity supplier following a fundamental change in  regulation of public utilities in this state. (v)  Set forth the level of the storm damage reserves and any limitations on how the reserve may be held, accessed or used. (vi)  With advice from, and in consultation with, the State Bond Commission and any outside consultant or counsel, the Public Service Commission shall establish and employ a  mechanism for making expeditious periodic adjustments in the system restoration charge that customers are required to pay under the financing order and for making any adjustments that are  necessary to correct for any overcollection or undercollection of the system restoration charge or to otherwise ensure the timely payment of system restoration bonds, financing costs and any other required amounts and charges payable in connection with the system restoration bonds. (vii)  Specify the system restoration property to be created in favor of the petitioning electric utility and require such electric utility to transfer such system restoration property to the state upon the issuance of system restoration bonds to secure prompt payment of the system restoration bonds  and any associated financing costs and any other required amounts and charges payable in connection therewith as they shall come due.  Such transfer of the system restoration property by an electric utility shall be an absolute transfer of such electric utility's right, title, and interest in the system restoration property. (viii)  With advice from, and in consultation with, the State Bond Commission and any outside consultant or counsel, specify, to the extent possible, the terms and conditions of the system restoration bonds, including, but not limited to, repayment schedules, maximum interest rates, issuance costs, financing costs, and any other required amounts and charges payable as  they shall come due. (ix)  Provide that the system restoration charge be allocated to the customer rate classes in the same manner that each such class is allocated its portion of the electric utility's annual base rate revenues using the criteria set out in Section 77-3-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, and the commission's rules, and allocated proportionately to special contact customers that take transmission level service. (x)  Provide that upon the issuance of system restoration bonds, the electric utility shall institute the resulting initial system restoration charge in accordance with the financing order and such initial system restoration charge shall be effective upon the issuance of such system restoration bonds without further action of the Public Service Commission. (c)  In performing any of its responsibilities under this subsection, the Public Service Commission may engage outside consultants or counsel, including, but not limited to, the State Bond Commission.  Any expenses associated with such services shall be included as part of financing costs and included in the total amount of system restoration bonds issued pursuant to this act. (d)  If the Public Service Commission issues a financing order and the system restoration charge is collected, the electric utility shall file with the Public Service Commission at least once annually a petition or a letter requesting the Public Service Commission to review the system restoration charge established in the financing order and make any necessary adjustments described in paragraph (b)(vi) of this subsection.  Within thirty (30) days after receiving an electric utility's petition or letter pursuant to this paragraph, the Public Service Commission shall, if necessary, revise the system restoration charge and notify the electric utility of such revision, or, if no revision to the system restoration charge is required, the Public Service Commission shall so notify the electric utility. (e)  Upon the Public Service Commission's revision of a system restoration charge and timely notification to the electric utility, the electric utility shall promptly adjust the system restoration charge to become effective the next practicable billing cycle as specified in the Public Service Commission's notification of such revision. (f)  Subsequent to the issuance of system restoration bonds authorized by a financing order, the financing order shall be irrevocable except as provided in this act.  Except as provided in this act, the Public Service Commission may not amend, modify or terminate the financing order by any subsequent action or reduce, impair, postpone, terminate or otherwise adjust the system restoration charge approved in the financing order.  After the issuance of a financing order, the electric utility retains sole discretion to request the system restoration bonds be issued. (g)  At the request of an electric utility, the Public Service Commission may commence a proceeding and issue a subsequent financing order that authorizes the retirement or refunding of system restoration bonds issued pursuant to the original financing order if the Public Service Commission finds that the subsequent financing order satisfies all of the criteria specified in this subsection.  Effective on retirement of the system restoration bonds and the issuance of new system restoration bonds, the Public Service Commission shall adjust the related system restoration charge accordingly. (h)  An electric utility shall have sixty (60) days from the issuance of a final financing order to request the State Bond Commission to authorize the issuance of system restoration bonds. Upon such request, the State Bond Commission shall authorize and issue the system restoration bonds as soon as practicable.  If no such request is made by the electric utility within sixty (60) days from the issuance of the final financing order by the Public Service Commission, the financing order shall stand repealed. SECTION 5.  A party to a proceeding on a petition for a financing order may appeal the financing order, after reconsideration as provided for in this act, by direct appeal to the Mississippi Supreme Court.  An appeal must be filed within seven (7) days after the petition for reconsideration has been refused or deemed refused, or within seven (7) days after the issuance of the final financing order upon reconsideration.  Every appeal shall briefly state the nature of the proceedings before the Public Service Commission, and shall specify the final financing order, upon reconsideration, complained of.  Upon the filing of an appeal, the Clerk of the Mississippi Supreme Court shall serve notice of the appeal upon the Public Service Commission, and the Public Service Commission shall, within twenty-one (21) days after the service of the notice, certify to the court the record in the case, which shall include a transcript of all testimony, together with all exhibits or copies of the exhibits, all pleadings, orders, findings and opinions entered in the case.  The parties and the Public Service Commission may stipulate that a specified portion of the record shall be certified to the court as the record on appeal.  Every appeal of Public Service Commission financing orders shall take precedence over other cases as a matter affecting the public interest, and the court shall docket and dispose of the appeal at the earliest time compatible with the ends of justice.  The court may hear and dispose of the appeal in termtime or vacation, and the court may sustain or dismiss the appeal, or modify or vacate the order complained of in whole or in part, as the case may be.  In case the order is wholly or partly vacated, the court may also, in its discretion, remand the matter to the Public Service Commission for such further proceedings not inconsistent with the order of the court as, in the opinion of the court, justice may require. The final financing order upon reconsideration shall not be vacated or set aside either in whole or in part, except for errors of law, unless the court finds that the order of the Public Service Commission is not supported by substantial evidence, is contrary to the manifest weight of the evidence, is in excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission, or violates constitutional rights.  If the Mississippi Supreme Court remands the matter to the Public Service Commission for further proceedings, the Public Service Commission shall enter a final financing order upon remand not more than thirty (30) days from the time of receipt of the mandate of the court. SECTION 6.  Except as provided in this act, a financing order shall: (a)  Remain in effect until the system restoration bonds issued pursuant to the order have been paid in full and the commission-approved financing costs of the system restoration bonds have been recovered in full. (b)  Remain in effect and unabated notwithstanding the bankruptcy, sale, transfer, reorganization, merger or dissolution of the electric utility or its successors or assignees. SECTION 7.  (1) System restoration bonds issued pursuant to a financing order shall not be the debt of the electric utility.  System restoration charges paid under any financing order shall not be considered the revenue of the electric utility for any purpose, including any evaluation of the electric utility made pursuant to a formula-type rate of return rate plan established in Section 77-3-2, Mississippi Code of 1972.  System restoration costs or financing costs, issuance costs and other costs specified in the financing order shall not be considered the costs of the electric utility. (2)  System restoration bonds shall not be used to finance any project, addition, plant, facility, extension, capital improvement, equipment, fuel charge, or any other expenditure, unless the electric utility has filed a petition under this act to finance such expenditure using system restoration bonds.   No action taken by an electric utility pursuant to a financing order issued under this act shall be deemed to be unjust or unreasonable. SECTION 8. (1)  (a) Upon transfer of the system restoration property by the electric utility to the state, all system restoration property that is specified in a financing order shall constitute an existing, present property right or interest of the state in the property, notwithstanding that the imposition and collection of a system restoration charge depends on the electric utility to which the financing order is issued performing its servicing functions relating to the collection of the system restoration charge and on future provision of electric service.  System restoration property shall exist whether or not the revenues or proceeds arising from the property have been billed, have accrued, or have been collected and notwithstanding the fact that the value or amount of the property is dependent on the future provision of service to customers by the electric utility or its successors or assignees. (b)  System restoration property specified in a financing order shall continue to exist until the system restoration bonds issued pursuant to the financing order are paid in full and all financing costs and other costs of the bonds have been recovered in full. (c)  All system restoration property specified in a financing order shall be pledged to secure system restoration bonds issued pursuant to the financing order. (d)  Upon transfer of the system restoration property by the electric utility to the state, the electric utility shall have no right to nor any interest in the system restoration property other than the obligation to collect the system restoration charges and transfer those charges to the state as directed in any financing order and any resolution of the State Bond Commission. (e)  Upon transfer of the system restoration property by the electric utility to the state, the interest of the state in the system restoration property specified in a financing order issued to an electric utility, and in the revenue and collections arising from that system restoration property, is not subject to setoff, counterclaim, surcharge or defense by the electric utility or any other person or in connection with the reorganization, bankruptcy or other insolvency of the electric utility or any other entity. (f)  Any successor to an electric utility, whether pursuant to any reorganization, bankruptcy or other insolvency proceeding, or whether pursuant to any merger or acquisition, sale or other business combination, or transfer by operation of law, as a result of electric utility restructuring or otherwise, shall perform and satisfy all obligations of, and have the same rights under a financing order as, the electric utility under the financing order in the same manner and to the same extent as the electric utility, including collecting and paying to the person entitled to receive the revenues, collections, payments or  proceeds of the system restoration property. SECTION 9. (1)  A special fund, to be designated the "Mississippi Severe Winter Storm of 2026 Electric Utility Customer Relief and Electric Utility System Restoration Fund", is created within the State Treasury.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund to the credit of the appropriate account. (2)  The expenditure of money deposited into the fund shall be under the direction of the commission, and such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the commission upon requisitions submitted by electric utilities and approved by the commission  pursuant to an exclusive procedure developed by the State Bond Commission with advice from, and in consultation with, the commission.  This procedure shall be incorporated in the State Bond Commission's resolution authorizing the sale of the bonds. Money deposited into the fund shall be disbursed to electric utilities from the appropriate account to pay the costs associated with system restoration activity by the electric utility that is necessary as a result of the storm. (3)  There shall be created accounts in the fund for each electric utility for which a financing order is issued.  The proceeds of system restoration bonds issued pursuant to a financing order shall be allocated to the account of the electric utility for which the financing order was issued. (4)  Immediately upon the deposit to the fund of the proceeds of the system restoration bonds, electric utilities shall be entitled to requisition disbursements from the appropriate account of the fund sufficient to recover the system restoration costs incurred by the electric utility prior to the date of the deposit of the proceeds of the system restoration bonds if the costs are approved by the commission in the financing order issued to the electric utility.  An electric utility may requisition disbursements from the appropriate account of the fund for costs incurred after the deposit to the fund of the proceeds of system restoration bonds if the costs are approved by the commission in conjunction with the financing order. (5)  The primary purpose of this act being to serve the public good and to benefit the public as a whole, any distributions of the bond proceeds to recover system restoration costs pursuant to this section are intended to be contributions to the capital of the electric utility companies making the requisitions. SECTION 10.  (1)  For the purpose of providing for the payment of the principal of and interest upon bonds issued under the provisions of this act and any related debt service costs, the State Treasurer shall establish in the State Treasury a system restoration bond sinking fund for each electric utility for which bonds are issued under this act pursuant to a financing order.  Each sinking fund shall consist of the system restoration property required to be deposited into the fund by an electric utility pursuant to this act and such other eligible funds as may otherwise be designated for deposit therein.  Funds required in excess of the amounts available in the system restoration bond sinking fund established for an electric utility to pay the principal of and interest when due upon bonds issued pursuant to a financing order issued for the electric utility pursuant to the provisions of this act shall be appropriated from the State General Fund.  Unexpended amounts remaining in a sinking fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned or investment earnings on amounts in a sinking fund shall be deposited into the sinking fund. (2)  All system restoration property received by an electric utility shall be deposited in the sinking fund of the electric utility not less than monthly upon receipt by the electric utility.  The State Treasurer shall mandate the manner in which such deposit shall be made. (3)  Any eligible funds other than system restoration property received by a participating electric utility or the state from any source for the purpose of financing or meeting system  restoration costs shall be paid into the system restoration sinking fund of each participating electric utility in proportion to their obligation for the payment of the system restoration bonds.  If such funds are directed to the state, the state shall determine the amount of money it would have directed to a participating electric utility in the absence of the participation by the electric utility in financing system restoration costs under this act, and direct that amount to the system restoration sinking fund of the participating electric utility. (4)  The money in each bond sinking fund established for an electric utility pursuant to this act shall be used to pay the principal and interest on system restoration bonds issued under a  financing order issued to the electric utility when due, and shall, when advisable, be paid as soon as possible to reduce the bonded indebtedness secured by that fund.  It is the purpose of this act to ensure that the system restoration bonds are retired as soon as possible, consistent with the terms of the bonds, the costs involved and the best interests of the electric utility customers to be benefited. (5)  When the State Bond Commission determines that a system restoration sinking fund or system restoration sinking funds are sufficient to retire the outstanding bonds, it shall certify this to the commission in writing.  The State Bond Commission shall retire the bonds not more than sixty (60) days after such certification.  Any unexpended amounts remaining in the sinking fund  following the retirement of the bonds shall be credited to the State General Fund. (6)  Upon the retirement of the bonds, the electric utility shall immediately petition the Public Service Commission for a determination to cease collection of system restoration charges from  electric utility customers. SECTION 11. (1)  An electric utility desiring the issuance of system restoration bonds pursuant to a financing order shall deliver a timely request to the State Bond Commission. Upon receipt of such request, the State Bond Commission, in its discretion, may act as the issuing  agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids, issue and sell the bonds so  authorized to be sold, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  With advice and consultation from the commission, the State Bond Commission shall determine the amount of bonds to be issued; however, the amount of bonds issued shall not exceed the amount authorized in the financing order. (2) Prior to the issuance of system restoration bonds under this act, the State Bond Commission shall request that the State Treasurer establish necessary system restoration bond sinking funds as provided in Section 10 of this act. (3)  Any investment earnings on amounts deposited into the Mississippi Severe Winter Storm of 2026 Electric Utility Customer Relief and Electric Utility System Restoration Fund created in Section 9 of this act shall be used to pay debt service on bonds issued under this act, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds. SECTION 12.  The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under this act shall be payable in the manner provided in this section.  Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in  such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972), be payable at such place or places within or outside of the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not more than twenty-five (25) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the State Bond Commission. SECTION 13.  The bonds authorized by this act shall be signed by the Chairman of the State Bond Commission, or by either his facsimile signature or electronic signatures, and the official seal of the State Bond Commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the Secretary of the State Bond Commission.   The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures or electronic signatures of such officers.  Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.  However, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi. SECTION 14.  All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this act have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform  Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by this act, the State Bond Commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code. SECTION 15. The State Bond Commission shall act as the issuing agent for the bonds authorized under this act, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and  sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The State Bond Commission is authorized and empowered to pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under this act from the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds.  The State Bond Commission may sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale or may negotiate the sale of the bonds for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the state. If such bonds are sold by sealed bids at public sale, notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least one time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or  having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi,  selected by the State Bond Commission. The State Bond Commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this act, may provide that bonds, at the option of the state, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein. SECTION 16. The bonds issued under the provisions of this act shall be payable from the appropriate sinking fund established pursuant to Section 10 of this act and, in the discretion of the State Bond Commission, may be issued as revenue bonds or general obligations of the State of Mississippi.  If the bonds are issued as general obligations of the state the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi shall be irrevocably pledged for the payment thereof, and if the funds available in the appropriate sinking fund and any funds appropriated by the Legislature for such purpose are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest upon such bonds as they become due, the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated.  All such general obligation bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the foregoing provisions of this section. If the bonds are issued as revenue bonds of the state, the principal of and interest on such bonds shall be payable solely from and shall be secured by the appropriate sinking fund created in Section 10 of this act.  Such revenue bonds shall never constitute an indebtedness of the State of Mississippi within the meaning of any state constitutional provision or statutory limitation and shall never constitute or give rise to a pecuniary liability of the State of Mississippi, or a charge against its general credit or taxing powers, and such fact shall be plainly stated on the face of each such bond. Such revenue bonds shall not be considered when computing any limitation of indebtedness of the State of Mississippi. All bonds issued under the authority of this act and all interest coupons applicable thereto shall be construed to be negotiable instruments, despite the fact that they are payable solely from a specified source. SECTION 17.  Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under the provisions of this act, the State Bond Commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to the special fund created in Section 9 of this act.  The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed solely as provided in Section 9 of this act. SECTION 18.  The bonds authorized under this act may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by this act.  Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this act shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the State Bond Commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the State Bond Commission by a majority of its members. SECTION 19.  The bonds authorized under the authority of this act may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and  with the force and effect provided by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the  validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds.  The notice to taxpayers  required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general  circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi. SECTION 20.  Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this act or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under this act, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this act to be  performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon. SECTION 21.  All bonds issued under the provisions of this act shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies  organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state  and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds. SECTION 22.  Upon an application by an electric utility to the commission pursuant to Section 4 of this act and the issuance of a financing order by the commission, the State Bond Commission shall, upon the request of the electric utility, issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying any system restoration bonds at or prior to their maturity or upon acceleration or redemption.  Refunding bonds may be issued at such time prior to the maturity or redemption of the refunded bonds as the commission and the State Bond Commission may determine.  The refunding bonds shall be issued pursuant to the Mississippi Bond Refinancing Act, Section 31- 27-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, or the General Refunding Law of 1934, Section 31-15-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 23.  Bonds issued under the provisions of this act and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi. SECTION 24.  The proceeds of the bonds issued under this act shall be used solely for the purposes herein provided, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds. SECTION 25.  The State Treasurer is authorized, without further process of law, to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Department of  Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accreted value of, all bonds issued under this act; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to  discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof. SECTION 26. (1) System restoration charges shall not be included within the gross income of the utility in the calculation of any sales tax pursuant to Section 27-65-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, or the calculation of any gross revenues of the electric utility in the calculation of any franchise fees pursuant to Section 77-3-17 Mississippi Code of 1972, or pursuant to any franchise fee agreement between any electric utility and any municipality. (2)  Nothing in this act shall be construed or interpreted as lessening or reducing the rights and privileges of an electric utility set out in Section 79-23-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, and in the Mississippi Uniform Trade Secrets Act, Section 75-26-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, and in the rules and regulations of the Public Service Commission implementing the provisions of such statutes. SECTION 27.  The state pledges to and agrees with bondholders, the owners of the system restoration property, and other financing parties that the state will not: (a)  Alter the provisions of this act which make the system restoration charge imposed by a financing order irrevocable; or (b)  Except as allowed under this act, reduce, alter or impair the system restoration charge that is to be imposed, collected and remitted for the benefit of the bondholders and other financing parties until any and all principal, interest, premium, financing costs and other fees, expenses or charges incurred, and any contracts to be performed, in connection with the related system restoration bonds have been paid and performed in full. SECTION 28.  The provisions of this act shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers therein granted, but this act shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state. SECTION 29.  Section 27-65-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-65-19.  (1)  (a) (i)  Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, upon every person selling to consumers, electricity, current, power, potable water, steam, coal, natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas or other fuel, there is hereby levied, assessed and shall be collected a tax equal to seven percent (7%) of the gross income of the business.  Provided, gross income from sales to consumers of electricity, current, power, natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas or other fuel for residential heating, lighting or other residential noncommercial or nonagricultural use, and sales of potable water for residential, noncommercial or nonagricultural use shall be excluded from taxable gross income of the business.  Provided further, upon every such seller using electricity, current, power, potable water, steam, coal, natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas or other fuel for nonindustrial purposes, there is hereby levied, assessed and shall be collected a tax equal to seven percent (7%) of the cost or value of the product or service used. (ii)  Gross income from sales to a church that is exempt from federal income taxation under 26 USCS Section 501(c)(3) of electricity, current, power, natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas or other fuel for heating, lighting or other use, and sales of potable water to such a church shall be excluded from taxable gross income of the business if the electricity, current, power, natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas or potable water is utilized on property that is primarily used for religious or educational purposes. (b)  (i)  There is hereby levied, assessed and shall be collected a tax equal to one and one-half percent (1-1/2%) of the gross income of the business from the sale of naturally occurring carbon dioxide and anthropogenic carbon dioxide lawfully injected into the earth for: 1.  Use in an enhanced oil recovery project, including, but not limited to, use for cycling, repressuring or lifting of oil; or 2.  Permanent sequestration in a geological formation. (ii)  The one and one-half percent (1-1/2%) rate provided for in this subsection shall apply to electricity, current, power, steam, coal, natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas or other fuel that is sold to a producer of oil and gas for use directly in enhanced oil recovery using carbon dioxide and/or the permanent sequestration of carbon dioxide in a geological formation. (c)  The one and one-half percent (1-1/2%) rate provided for in this subsection shall not apply to sales of fuel for automobiles, trucks, truck-tractors, buses, farm tractors or airplanes. (d)  (i)  Upon every person providing services in this state, there is hereby levied, assessed and shall be collected: 1.  A tax equal to seven percent (7%) of the gross income received from all charges for intrastate telecommunications services. 2.  A tax equal to seven percent (7%) of the gross income received from all charges for interstate telecommunications services. 3.  A tax equal to seven percent (7%) of the gross income received from all charges for international telecommunications services. 4.  A tax equal to seven percent (7%) of the gross income received from all charges for ancillary services. Sales of computer software, computer software services, specified digital products, or other products delivered electronically, including, but not limited to, music, games, reading materials or ring tones, shall be taxed as provided in other sections of this chapter. (ii)  A person, upon proof that he has paid a tax in another state on an event described in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph (d), shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed in this paragraph (d) on interstate telecommunications service charges to the extent that the amount of such tax is properly due and actually paid in such other state and to the extent that the rate of sales tax imposed by and paid in such other state does not exceed the rate of sales tax imposed by this paragraph (d). (iii)  Charges by one (1) telecommunications provider to another telecommunications provider holding a permit issued under Section 27-65-27 for services that are resold by such other telecommunications provider, including, but not limited to, access charges, shall not be subject to the tax levied pursuant to this paragraph (d). (iv)  For purposes of this paragraph (d): 1.  "Telecommunications service" means the electronic transmission, conveyance or routing of voice, data, audio, video or any other information or signals to a point, or between points.  The term "telecommunications service" includes such transmission, conveyance or routing in which computer processing applications are used to act on the form, code or protocol of the content for purposes of transmission, conveyance or routing without regard to whether such service is referred to as Voice over Internet Protocol services or is classified by the Federal Communications Commission as enhanced or value added.  The term "telecommunications service" shall not include: a.  Data processing and information services that allow data to be generated, acquired, stored, processed or retrieved and delivered by an electronic transmission to a purchaser where such purchaser's primary purpose for the underlying transaction is the processed data or information; b. Installation or maintenance of wiring or equipment on a customer's premises; c. Tangible personal property; d. Advertising, including, but not limited to, directory advertising; e. Billing and collection services provided to third parties; f. Internet access service; g.  Radio and television audio and video programming services regardless of the medium, including the furnishing of transmission, conveyance and routing of such services by the programming service provider.  Radio and television audio and video programming services shall include, but not be limited to, cable service as defined in 47 USCS 522(6) and audio and video programming services delivered by commercial mobile radio service providers, as defined in 47 CFR 20.3; h. Ancillary services; or i. Digital products delivered electronically, including, but not limited to, computer software, computer software services, electronically stored or maintained data, music, video, reading materials, specified digital products, or ring tones. 2. "Ancillary services" means services that are associated with or incidental to the provision of telecommunications services, including, but not limited to, detailed telecommunications billing, directory assistance, vertical service and voice mail service. a. "Conference bridging" means an ancillary service that links two (2) or more participants of an audio or video conference call and may include the provision of a telephone number.  Conference bridging does not include the telecommunications services used to reach the conference bridge. b. "Detailed telecommunications billing service" means an ancillary service of separately stating information pertaining to individual calls on a customer's billing statement. c. "Directory assistance" means an ancillary service of providing telephone number information and/or address information. d. "Vertical service" means an ancillary service that is offered in connection with one or more telecommunications services, which offers advanced calling features that allow customers to identify callers and to manage multiple calls and call connections, including conference bridging services. e. "Voice mail service" means an ancillary service that enables the customer to store, send or receive recorded messages.  Voice mail service does not include any vertical services that the customer may be required to have in order to utilize the voice mail service. 3.  "Intrastate" means telecommunications service that originates in one (1) United States state or United States territory or possession, and terminates in the same United States state or United States territory or possession. 4. "Interstate" means a telecommunications service that originates in one (1) United States state or United States territory or possession, and terminates in a different United States state or United States territory or possession. 5. "International" means a telecommunications service that originates or terminates in the United States and terminates or originates outside the United States, respectively. (v)  For purposes of paragraph (d), the following sourcing rules shall apply: 1.  Except for the defined telecommunications services in item 3 of this subparagraph, the sales of telecommunications services sold on a call-by-call basis shall be sourced to: a.  Each level of taxing jurisdiction where the call originates and terminates in that jurisdiction, or b.  Each level of taxing jurisdiction where the call either originates or terminates and in which the service address is also located. 2.  Except for the defined telecommunications services in item 3 of this subparagraph, a sale of telecommunications services sold on a basis other than a call-by-call basis, is sourced to the customer's place of primary use. 3.  The sale of the following telecommunications services shall be sourced to each level of taxing jurisdiction as follows: a.  A sale of mobile telecommunications services other than air-to-ground radiotelephone service and prepaid calling service is sourced to the customer's place of primary use as required by the Mobile Telecommunication Sourcing Act. A. A home service provider shall be responsible for obtaining and maintaining the customer's place of primary use.  The home service provider shall be entitled to rely on the applicable residential or business street address supplied by such customer, if the home service provider's reliance is in good faith; and the home service provider shall be held harmless from liability for any additional taxes based on a different determination of the place of primary use for taxes that are customarily passed on to the customer as a separate itemized charge.  A home service provider shall be allowed to treat the address used for purposes of the tax levied by this chapter for any customer under a service contract in effect on August 1, 2002, as that customer's place of primary use for the remaining term of such service contract or agreement, excluding any extension or renewal of such service contract or agreement.  Month-to-month services provided after the expiration of a contract shall be treated as an extension or renewal of such contract or agreement. B. If the commissioner determines that the address used by a home service provider as a customer's place of primary use does not meet the definition of the term "place of primary use" as defined in subitem a.A. of this item 3, the commissioner shall give binding notice to the home service provider to change the place of primary use on a prospective basis from the date of notice of determination; however, the customer shall have the opportunity, prior to such notice of determination, to demonstrate that such address satisfies the definition. C. The department has the right to collect any taxes due directly from the home service provider's customer that has failed to provide an address that meets the definition of the term "place of primary use" which resulted in a failure of tax otherwise due being remitted. b.  A sale of postpaid calling service is sourced to the origination point of the telecommunications signal as first identified by either: A. The seller's telecommunications system; or B. Information received by the seller from its service provider, where the system used to transport such signals is not that of the seller. c.  A sale of a prepaid calling service or prepaid wireless calling service shall be subject to the tax imposed by this paragraph if the sale takes place in this state.  If the customer physically purchases a prepaid calling service or prepaid wireless calling service at the vendor's place of business, the sale is deemed to take place at the vendor's place of business.  If the customer does not physically purchase the service at the vendor's place of business, the sale of a prepaid calling card or prepaid wireless calling card is deemed to take place at the first of the following locations that applies to the sale: A. The customer's shipping address, if the sale involves a shipment; B. The customer's billing address; C. Any other address of the customer that is known by the vendor; or D. The address of the vendor, or alternatively, in the case of a prepaid wireless calling service, the location associated with the mobile telephone number. 4.  A sale of a private communication service is sourced as follows: a. Service for a separate charge related to a customer channel termination point is sourced to each level of jurisdiction in which such customer channel termination point is located. b. Service where all customer termination points are located entirely within one (1) jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction is sourced in such jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points are located. c. Service for segments of a channel between two (2) customer channel termination points located in different jurisdictions and which segments of a channel are separately charged is sourced fifty percent (50%) in each level of jurisdiction in which the customer channel termination points are located. d. Service for segments of a channel located in more than one (1) jurisdiction or levels of jurisdiction and which segments are not separately billed is sourced in each jurisdiction based on the percentage determined by dividing the number of customer channel termination points in such jurisdiction by the total number of customer channel termination points. 5.  A sale of ancillary services is sourced to the customer's place of primary use. (vi)  For purposes of subparagraph (v) of this paragraph (d): 1.  "Air-to-ground radiotelephone service" means a radio service, as that term is defined in 47 CFR 22.99, in which common carriers are authorized to offer and provide radio telecommunications service for hire to subscribers in aircraft. 2.  "Call-by-call basis" means any method of charging for telecommunications services where the price is measured by individual calls. 3. "Communications channel" means a physical or virtual path of communications over which signals are transmitted between or among customer channel termination points. 4. "Customer" means the person or entity that contracts with the seller of telecommunications services.  If the end user of telecommunications services is not the contracting party, the end user of the telecommunications service is the customer of the telecommunications service.  Customer does not include a reseller of telecommunications service or for mobile telecommunications service of a serving carrier under an agreement to serve the customer outside the home service provider's licensed service area. 5. "Customer channel termination point" means the location where the customer either inputs or receives the communications. 6.  "End user" means the person who utilizes the telecommunications service.  In the case of an entity, "end user" means the individual who utilizes the service on behalf of the entity. 7.  "Home service provider" has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 124(5) of Public Law 106-252 (Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act). 8. "Mobile telecommunications service" has the meaning ascribed to such term in Section 124(7) of Public Law 106-252 (Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act). 9. "Place of primary use" means the street address representative of where the customer's use of the telecommunications service primarily occurs, which must be the residential street address or the primary business street address of the customer.  In the case of mobile telecommunications services, the place of primary use must be within the licensed service area of the home service provider. 10. "Post-paid calling service" means the telecommunications service obtained by making a payment on a call-by-call basis either through the use of a credit card or payment mechanism such as a bank card, travel card, credit card or debit card, or by charge made to a telephone number which is not associated with the origination or termination of the telecommunications service.  A post-paid calling service includes a telecommunications service, except a prepaid wireless calling service that would be a prepaid calling service except it is not exclusively a telecommunications service. 11. "Prepaid calling service" means the right to access exclusively telecommunications services, which must be paid for in advance and which enables the origination of calls using an access number or authorization code, whether manually or electronically dialed, and that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount. 12. "Prepaid wireless calling service" means a telecommunications service that provides the right to utilize mobile wireless service as well as other nontelecommunications services, including the download of digital products delivered electronically, content and ancillary service, which must be paid for in advance that is sold in predetermined units or dollars of which the number declines with use in a known amount. 13. "Private communication service" means a telecommunications service that entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of a communications channel or group of channels between or among termination points, regardless of the manner in which such channel or channels are connected, and includes switching capacity, extension lines, stations and any other associated services that are provided in connection with the use of such channel or channels. 14. "Service address" means: a.  The location of the telecommunications equipment to which a customer's call is charged and from which the call originates or terminates, regardless of where the call is billed or paid. b.  If the location in subitem a of this item 14 is not known, the origination point of the signal of the telecommunications services first identified by either the seller's telecommunications system or in information received by the seller from its service provider, where the system used to transport such signals is not that of the seller. c.  If the location in subitems a and b of this item 14 are not known, the location of the customer's place of primary use. (vii)  1.  For purposes of this subparagraph (vii), "bundled transaction" means a transaction that consists of distinct and identifiable properties or services which are sold for a single nonitemized price but which are treated differently for tax purposes. 2.  In the case of a bundled transaction that includes telecommunications services, ancillary services, internet access, or audio or video programming services taxed under this chapter in which the price of the bundled transaction is attributable to properties or services that are taxable and nontaxable, the portion of the price that is attributable to any nontaxable property or service shall be subject to the tax unless the provider can reasonably identify that portion from its books and records kept in the regular course of business. 3.  In the case of a bundled transaction that includes telecommunications services, ancillary services, internet access, audio or video programming services subject to tax under this chapter in which the price is attributable to properties or services that are subject to the tax but the tax revenue from the different properties or services are dedicated to different funds or purposes, the provider shall allocate the price among the properties or services: a.  By reasonably identifying the portion of the price attributable to each of the properties and services from its books and records kept in the regular course of business; or b.  Based on a reasonable allocation methodology approved by the department. 4.  This subparagraph (vii) shall not create a right of action for a customer to require that the provider or the department, for purposes of determining the amount of tax applicable to a bundled transaction, allocate the price to the different portions of the transaction in order to minimize the amount of tax charged to the customer.  A customer shall not be entitled to rely on the fact that a portion of the price is attributable to properties or services not subject to tax unless the provider elects, after receiving a written request from the customer in the form required by the provider, to provide verifiable data based upon the provider's books and records that are kept in the regular course of business that reasonably identifies the portion of the price attributable to the properties or services not subject to the tax. (2)  Persons making sales to consumers of electricity, current, power, natural gas, liquefied petroleum gas or other fuel for residential heating, lighting or other residential noncommercial or nonagricultural use or sales of potable water for residential, noncommercial or nonagricultural use shall indicate on each statement rendered to customers that such charges are exempt from sales taxes. (3)  There is hereby levied, assessed and shall be paid on transportation charges on shipments moving between points within this state when paid directly by the consumer, a tax equal to the rate applicable to the sale of the property being transported.  Such tax shall be reported and paid directly to the Department of Revenue by the consumer. SECTION 30.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.